Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 2. Paid Advertising in any Communication Medium or Printed Literature to Support, Oppose or Influence Legislation

§ 22-24-201.
Paid advertising; penalty.

Any group of persons who are associated for the purpose of raising, collecting or spending money for paid advertising in any communication media or for printed literature to support, oppose or otherwise influence legislation by the legislature of the state of Wyoming, which is or was the subject of a statewide initiative or referendum within the past four (4) years, shall:

File a statement of formation listing the names and addresses of its chairman and treasurer with the secretary of state within ten (10) days after formation and prior to the publication, dissemination or broadcast of any paid advertising from the group;

File with the secretary of state a statement of contributions and expenditures setting forth the full and complete record of contributions including cash, goods or services and actual and promised expenditures, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, on the last Friday in December of each calendar year. In addition to the annual report, while the legislature is in session, there shall be filed an interim monthly statement for each month or portion thereof that the legislature is in session, within ten (10) days of the first day of the month for the previous month;

If the total contributions and expenditures reported under paragraph (a)(ii) of this section lists any contribution in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) from any source or sources other than an individual, the report shall include a full and complete disclosure of the funding source or sources of any nonindividual contributor which funded the advertising.

Any group formed under this section shall file a termination report within thirty (30) days after it ceases the regulated activity but cessation of activity shall not relieve the group of the reporting requirement for that filing period.

No group subject to this section shall pay for advertising in any communication media or printed literature without full disclosure of the name of the group.

Nothing in this section shall require an individual or individuals who pay for advertising or literature to support, oppose or otherwise influence legislation to file under this section, provided the name of the individual or individuals is fully disclosed in the advertising or literature.

As used in this section:

“Communication media” means advertising on television, radio, in print media, on billboards and other electronic media;

“Printed literature” means any printed material but shall not include any member association printed communication not intended for public dissemination, bumper stickers, pens, pencils, buttons, rulers, nail files, balloons and yard signs.

Any person who willfully and knowingly violates any of the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided by W.S.

22-26-112

.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 201, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2015 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “contributions” for “receipts” in (a)(ii) and (a)(iii).